Illinois, session 104th, SB299.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Capital Crimes Litigation Act of 2025. 6    Section 5. Appointment of trial counsel in death penalty 7cases. If an indigent defendant is charged with an offense for 8which a sentence of death is authorized, and the State's 9Attorney has not, at or before arraignment, filed a 10certificate indicating he or she will not seek the death 11penalty or stated on the record in open court that the death 12penalty will not be sought, the trial court shall immediately 13appoint the Public Defender, or any other qualified attorney 14or attorneys as the Illinois Supreme Court shall by rule 15provide, to represent the defendant as trial counsel. If the 16Public Defender is appointed, he or she shall immediately 17assign the attorney or attorneys who are public defenders to 18represent the defendant. The counsel shall meet the 19qualifications as the Supreme Court shall by rule provide. At 20the request of court appointed counsel in a case in which the 21death penalty is sought, attorneys employed by the State 22Appellate Defender may enter an appearance for the limited 23purpose of assisting counsel appointed under this Section.    SB0299- 2 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Section 10. Court appointed trial counsel; compensation 2and expenses. 3    (a) This Section applies only to compensation and expenses 4of trial counsel appointed by the court as set forth in Section 55, other than public defenders, for the period after 6arraignment and so long as the State's Attorney has not, at any 7time, filed a certificate indicating he or she will not seek 8the death penalty or stated on the record in open court that 9the death penalty will not be sought.10    (a-5) Litigation budget.11        (1) In a case in which the State has filed a statement 12    of intent to seek the death penalty, the court shall 13    require appointed counsel, including those appointed in 14    Cook County, after counsel has had adequate time to review 15    the case and prior to engaging trial assistance, to submit 16    a proposed estimated litigation budget for court approval, 17    that will be subject to modification in light of facts and 18    developments that emerge as the case proceeds. Case 19    budgets should be submitted ex parte and filed and 20    maintained under seal in order to protect the defendant's 21    right to effective assistance of counsel, right not to 22    incriminate him or herself and all applicable privileges. 23    Case budgets shall be reviewed and approved by the judge 24    assigned to try the case. As provided under subsection (c) 25    of this Section, petitions for compensation shall be   SB0299- 3 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    reviewed by both the trial judge and the presiding judge 2    or the presiding judge's designee. 3        (2) The litigation budget shall serve purposes 4    comparable to those of private retainer agreements by 5    confirming both the court's and the attorney's 6    expectations regarding fees and expenses. Consideration 7    should be given to employing an ex parte pretrial 8    conference in order to facilitate reaching agreement on a 9    litigation budget at the earliest opportunity.10        (3) The budget shall be incorporated into a sealed 11    initial pretrial order that reflects the understandings of 12    the court and counsel regarding all matters affecting 13    counsel compensation and reimbursement and payments for 14    investigative, expert and other services, including, but 15    not limited to, the following matters:16            (A) the hourly rate at which counsel will be 17        compensated;18            (B) the hourly rate at which private 19        investigators, other than investigators employed by 20        the Office of the State Appellate Defender, will be 21        compensated; and22            (C) the best preliminary estimate that can be made 23        of the cost of all services, including, but not 24        limited to, counsel, expert, and investigative 25        services that are likely to be needed through the 26        guilt and penalty phases of the trial. The court shall   SB0299- 4 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        have discretion to require that budgets be prepared 2        for shorter intervals of time.3        (4) Appointed counsel may obtain, subject to later 4    review, investigative, expert, or other services without 5    prior authorization if necessary for an adequate defense. 6    If the services are obtained, the presiding judge or the 7    presiding judge's designee shall consider in an ex parte 8    proceeding that timely procurement of necessary services 9    could not await prior authorization. If an ex parte 10    hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed 11    necessary by the trial judge prior to modifying a budget, 12    the ex parte hearing shall be before the presiding judge 13    or the presiding judge's designee. The judge may then 14    authorize the services nunc pro tunc. If the presiding 15    judge or the presiding judge's designee finds that the 16    services were not reasonable, payment may be denied.17        (5) An approved budget shall guide counsel's use of 18    time and resources by indicating the services for which 19    compensation is authorized. The case budget shall be 20    re-evaluated when justified by changed or unexpected 21    circumstances and shall be modified by the court when 22    reasonable and necessary for an adequate defense. If an ex 23    parte hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed 24    necessary by the trial judge prior to modifying a budget, 25    the ex parte hearing shall be before the presiding judge 26    or the presiding judge's designee.  SB0299- 5 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    (b) Appointed trial counsel shall be compensated upon 2presentment and certification by the circuit court of a claim 3for services detailing the date, activity, and time duration 4for which compensation is sought. Compensation for appointed 5trial counsel may be paid at a reasonable rate not to exceed 6$125 per hour. The court shall not authorize payment of bills 7that are not properly itemized. A request for payment shall be 8presented under seal and reviewed ex parte with a court 9reporter present. Every January 20, the statutory rate 10prescribed in this subsection shall be automatically increased 11or decreased, as applicable, by a percentage equal to the 12percentage change in the consumer price index-u during the 13preceding 12-month calendar year. "Consumer price index-u" 14means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 15the United States Department of Labor that measures the 16average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 17all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 181982-84=100. The new rate resulting from each annual 19adjustment shall be determined by the State Treasurer and made 20available to the chief judge of each judicial circuit.21    (c) Appointed trial counsel may also petition the court 22for certification of expenses for reasonable and necessary 23capital litigation expenses including, but not limited to, 24investigatory and other assistance, expert, forensic, and 25other witnesses, and mitigation specialists. Each provider of 26proposed services must specify the best preliminary estimate   SB0299- 6 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1that can be made in light of information received in the case 2at that point, and the provider must sign this estimate under 3the provisions of Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil 4Procedure. A provider of proposed services must also specify: 5(1) his or her hourly rate; (2) the hourly rate of anyone else 6in his or her employ for whom reimbursement is sought; and (3) 7the hourly rate of any person or entity that may be 8subcontracted to perform these services. Counsel may not 9petition for certification of expenses that may have been 10provided or compensated by the State Appellate Defender under 11item (c)(5.1) of Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender 12Act. The petitions shall be filed under seal and considered ex 13parte but with a court reporter present for all ex parte 14conferences. If the requests are submitted after services have 15been rendered, the requests shall be supported by an invoice 16describing the services rendered, the dates the services were 17performed and the amount of time spent. These petitions shall 18be reviewed by both the trial judge and the presiding judge of 19the circuit court or the presiding judge's designee. The 20petitions and orders shall be kept under seal and shall be 21exempt from Freedom of Information requests until the 22conclusion of the trial, even if the prosecution chooses not 23to pursue the death penalty prior to trial or sentencing. If an 24ex parte hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed 25necessary by the trial judge, the hearing shall be before the 26presiding judge or the presiding judge's designee.  SB0299- 7 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    (d) Appointed trial counsel shall petition the court for 2certification of compensation and expenses under this Section 3periodically during the course of counsel's representation. 4The petitions shall be supported by itemized bills showing the 5date, the amount of time spent, the work done, and the total 6being charged for each entry. The court shall not authorize 7payment of bills that are not properly itemized. The court 8must certify reasonable and necessary expenses of the 9petitioner for travel and per diem (lodging, meals, and 10incidental expenses). These expenses must be paid at the rate 11as promulgated by the United States General Services 12Administration for these expenses for the date and location in 13which they were incurred, unless extraordinary reasons are 14shown for the difference. The petitions shall be filed under 15seal and considered ex parte but with a court reporter present 16for all ex parte conferences. The petitions shall be reviewed 17by both the trial judge and the presiding judge of the circuit 18court or the presiding judge's designee. If an ex parte 19hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed necessary by 20the trial judge, the ex parte hearing shall be before the 21presiding judge or the presiding judge's designee. If the 22court determines that the compensation and expenses should be 23paid from the Capital Litigation Trust Fund, the court shall 24certify, on a form created by the State Treasurer, that all or 25a designated portion of the amount requested is reasonable, 26necessary, and appropriate for payment from the Trust Fund.   SB0299- 8 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1The form must also be signed by lead trial counsel under the 2provisions of Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure 3verifying that the amount requested is reasonable, necessary, 4and appropriate. Bills submitted for payment by any individual 5or entity seeking payment from the Capital Litigation Trust 6Fund must also be accompanied by a form created by the State 7Treasurer and signed by the individual or responsible agent of 8the entity under the provisions of Section 1-109 of the Code of 9Civil Procedure that the amount requested is accurate and 10truthful and reflects time spent or expenses incurred. 11Certification of compensation and expenses by a court in any 12county other than Cook County shall be delivered by the court 13to the State Treasurer and must be paid by the State Treasurer 14directly from the Capital Litigation Trust Fund if there are 15sufficient moneys in the Trust Fund to pay the compensation 16and expenses. If the State Treasurer finds within 14 days of 17his or her receipt of a certification that the compensation 18and expenses to be paid are unreasonable, unnecessary, or 19inappropriate, he or she may return the certification to the 20court setting forth in detail the objection or objections with 21a request for the court to review the objection or objections 22before resubmitting the certification. The State Treasurer 23must send the claimant a copy of the objection or objections. 24The State Treasurer may only seek a review of a specific 25objection once. The claimant has 7 days from his or her receipt 26of the objections to file a response with the court. With or   SB0299- 9 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1without further hearing, the court must promptly rule on the 2objections. The petitions and orders shall be kept under seal 3and shall be exempt from Freedom of Information requests until 4the conclusion of the trial and appeal of the case, even if the 5prosecution chooses not to pursue the death penalty prior to 6trial or sentencing. Certification of compensation and 7expenses by a court in Cook County shall be delivered by the 8court to the county treasurer and paid by the county treasurer 9from moneys granted to the county from the Capital Litigation 10Trust Fund. 11    Section 15. Capital Litigation Trust Fund. 12    (a) The Capital Litigation Trust Fund is created as a 13special fund in the State Treasury. The Trust Fund shall be 14administered by the State Treasurer to provide moneys for the 15appropriations to be made, grants to be awarded, and 16compensation and expenses to be paid under this Act. All 17interest earned from the investment or deposit of moneys 18accumulated in the Trust Fund shall, under Section 4.1 of the 19State Finance Act, be deposited into the Trust Fund.20    (b) Moneys deposited into the Trust Fund shall not be 21considered general revenue of the State of Illinois.22    (c) Moneys deposited into the Trust Fund shall be used 23exclusively for the purposes of providing funding for the 24prosecution and defense of capital cases and for providing 25funding for post-conviction proceedings in capital cases under   SB0299- 10 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in 2relation to petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code 3of Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases as provided in 4this Act and shall not be appropriated, loaned, or in any 5manner transferred to the General Revenue Fund of the State of 6Illinois.7    (d) Every fiscal year the State Treasurer shall transfer 8from the General Revenue Fund to the Capital Litigation Trust 9Fund an amount equal to the full amount of moneys appropriated 10by the General Assembly (both by original and supplemental 11appropriation), less any unexpended balance from the previous 12fiscal year, from the Capital Litigation Trust Fund for the 13specific purpose of making funding available for the 14prosecution and defense of capital cases and for the 15litigation expenses associated with post-conviction 16proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of 17Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed 18under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in 19relation to capital cases. The Public Defender and State's 20Attorney in Cook County, the State Appellate Defender, the 21State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, and the Attorney 22General shall make annual requests for appropriations from the 23Trust Fund.24        (1) The Public Defender in Cook County shall request 25    appropriations to the State Treasurer for expenses 26    incurred by the Public Defender and for funding for   SB0299- 11 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    private appointed defense counsel in Cook County.2        (2) The State's Attorney in Cook County shall request 3    an appropriation to the State Treasurer for expenses 4    incurred by the State's Attorney.5        (3) The State Appellate Defender shall request a 6    direct appropriation from the Trust Fund for expenses 7    incurred by the State Appellate Defender in providing 8    assistance to trial attorneys under item (c)(5.1) of 9    Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender Act and for 10    expenses incurred by the State Appellate Defender in 11    representing petitioners in capital cases in 12    post-conviction proceedings under Article 122 of the Code 13    of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions 14    filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure 15    in relation to capital cases and for the representation of 16    those petitioners by attorneys approved by or contracted 17    with the State Appellate Defender and an appropriation to 18    the State Treasurer for payments from the Trust Fund for 19    the defense of cases in counties other than Cook County.20        (4) The State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor shall 21    request a direct appropriation from the Trust Fund to pay 22    expenses incurred by the State's Attorneys Appellate 23    Prosecutor and an appropriation to the State Treasurer for 24    payments from the Trust Fund for expenses incurred by 25    State's Attorneys in counties other than Cook County.26        (5) The Attorney General shall request a direct   SB0299- 12 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    appropriation from the Trust Fund to pay expenses incurred 2    by the Attorney General in assisting the State's Attorneys 3    in counties other than Cook County and to pay for expenses 4    incurred by the Attorney General when the Attorney General 5    is ordered by the presiding judge of the Criminal Division 6    of the Circuit Court of Cook County to prosecute or 7    supervise the prosecution of Cook County cases and for 8    expenses incurred by the Attorney General in representing 9    the State in post-conviction proceedings in capital cases 10    under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 11    1963 and in relation to petitions filed under Section 12    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation to 13    capital cases. The Public Defender and State's Attorney in 14    Cook County, the State Appellate Defender, the State's 15    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, and the Attorney General 16    may each request supplemental appropriations from the 17    Trust Fund during the fiscal year.18    (e) Moneys in the Trust Fund shall be expended only as 19follows:20        (1) To pay the State Treasurer's costs to administer 21    the Trust Fund. The amount for this purpose may not exceed 22    5% in any one fiscal year of the amount otherwise 23    appropriated from the Trust Fund in the same fiscal year. 24        (2) To pay the capital litigation expenses of trial 25    defense and post-conviction proceedings in capital cases 26    under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of   SB0299- 13 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    1963 and in relation to petitions filed under Section 2    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation to 3    capital cases including, but not limited to, DNA testing, 4    including DNA testing under Section 116-3 of the Code of 5    Criminal Procedure of 1963, analysis, and expert 6    testimony, investigatory and other assistance, expert, 7    forensic, and other witnesses, and mitigation specialists, 8    and grants and aid provided to public defenders, appellate 9    defenders, and any attorney approved by or contracted with 10    the State Appellate Defender representing petitioners in 11    post-conviction proceedings in capital cases under Article 12    122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in 13    relation to petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the 14    Code of Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases or 15    assistance to attorneys who have been appointed by the 16    court to represent defendants who are charged with capital 17    crimes. Reasonable and necessary capital litigation 18    expenses include travel and per diem (lodging, meals, and 19    incidental expenses).20        (3) To pay the compensation of trial attorneys, other 21    than public defenders or appellate defenders, who have 22    been appointed by the court to represent defendants who 23    are charged with capital crimes or attorneys approved by 24    or contracted with the State Appellate Defender to 25    represent petitioners in post-conviction proceedings in 26    capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal   SB0299- 14 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed under 2    Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation 3    to capital cases.4        (4) To provide State's Attorneys with funding for 5    capital litigation expenses and for expenses of 6    representing the State in post-conviction proceedings in 7    capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal 8    Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed under 9    Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation 10    to capital cases including, but not limited to, 11    investigatory and other assistance and expert, forensic, 12    and other witnesses necessary to prosecute capital cases. 13    State's Attorneys in any county other than Cook County 14    seeking funding for capital litigation expenses and for 15    expenses of representing the State in post-conviction 16    proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 of the Code 17    of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions 18    filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure 19    in relation to capital cases including, but not limited 20    to, investigatory and other assistance and expert, 21    forensic, or other witnesses under this Section may 22    request that the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor or 23    the Attorney General, as the case may be, certify the 24    expenses as reasonable, necessary, and appropriate for 25    payment from the Trust Fund, on a form created by the State 26    Treasurer. Upon certification of the expenses and delivery   SB0299- 15 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    of the certification to the State Treasurer, the Treasurer 2    shall pay the expenses directly from the Capital 3    Litigation Trust Fund if there are sufficient moneys in 4    the Trust Fund to pay the expenses.5        (5) To provide financial support through the Attorney 6    General under the Attorney General Act for the several 7    county State's Attorneys outside of Cook County, but shall 8    not be used to increase personnel for the Attorney 9    General's Office, except when the Attorney General is 10    ordered by the presiding judge of the Criminal Division of 11    the Circuit Court of Cook County to prosecute or supervise 12    the prosecution of Cook County cases.13        (6) To provide financial support through the State's 14    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor under the State's Attorneys 15    Appellate Prosecutor's Act for the several county State's 16    Attorneys outside of Cook County, but shall not be used to 17    increase personnel for the State's Attorneys Appellate 18    Prosecutor.19        (7) To provide financial support to the State 20    Appellate Defender under the State Appellate Defender Act. 21    Moneys expended from the Trust Fund shall be in addition 22    to county funding for Public Defenders and State's 23    Attorneys, and shall not be used to supplant or reduce 24    ordinary and customary county funding.25    (f) Moneys in the Trust Fund shall be appropriated to the 26State Appellate Defender, the State's Attorneys Appellate   SB0299- 16 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1Prosecutor, the Attorney General, and the State Treasurer. The 2State Appellate Defender shall receive an appropriation from 3the Trust Fund to enable it to provide assistance to appointed 4defense counsel and attorneys approved by or contracted with 5the State Appellate Defender to represent petitioners in 6post-conviction proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 7of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to 8petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil 9Procedure in relation to capital cases throughout the State 10and to Public Defenders in counties other than Cook. The 11State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor and the Attorney 12General shall receive appropriations from the Trust Fund to 13enable them to provide assistance to State's Attorneys in 14counties other than Cook County and when the Attorney General 15is ordered by the presiding judge of the Criminal Division of 16the Circuit Court of Cook County to prosecute or supervise the 17prosecution of Cook County cases. Moneys shall be appropriated 18to the State Treasurer to enable the Treasurer: (i) to make 19grants to Cook County; (ii) to pay the expenses of Public 20Defenders, the State Appellate Defender, the Attorney General, 21the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, and 22State's Attorneys in counties other than Cook County; (iii) to 23pay the expenses and compensation of appointed defense counsel 24and attorneys approved by or contracted with the State 25Appellate Defender to represent petitioners in post-conviction 26proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of   SB0299- 17 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed 2under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in 3relation to capital cases in counties other than Cook County; 4and (iv) to pay the costs of administering the Trust Fund. All 5expenditures and grants made from the Trust Fund shall be 6subject to audit by the Auditor General.7    (g) For Cook County, grants from the Trust Fund shall be 8made and administered as follows:9        (1) For each State fiscal year, the State's Attorney 10    and Public Defender must each make a separate application 11    to the State Treasurer for capital litigation grants.12        (2) The State Treasurer shall establish rules and 13    procedures for grant applications. The rules shall require 14    the Cook County Treasurer as the grant recipient to report 15    on a periodic basis to the State Treasurer how much of the 16    grant has been expended, how much of the grant is 17    remaining, and the purposes for which the grant has been 18    used. The rules may also require the Cook County Treasurer 19    to certify on a periodic basis that expenditures of the 20    funds have been made for expenses that are reasonable, 21    necessary, and appropriate for payment from the Trust 22    Fund.23        (3) The State Treasurer shall make the grants to the 24    Cook County Treasurer as soon as possible after the 25    beginning of the State fiscal year.26        (4) The State's Attorney or Public Defender may apply   SB0299- 18 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    for supplemental grants during the fiscal year.2        (5) Grant moneys shall be paid to the Cook County 3    Treasurer in block grants and held in separate accounts 4    for the State's Attorney, the Public Defender, and court 5    appointed defense counsel other than the Cook County 6    Public Defender, respectively, for the designated fiscal 7    year, and are not subject to county appropriation.8        (6) Expenditure of grant moneys under this subsection 9    (g) is subject to audit by the Auditor General.10        (7) The Cook County Treasurer shall immediately make 11    payment from the appropriate separate account in the 12    county treasury for capital litigation expenses to the 13    State's Attorney, Public Defender, or court appointed 14    defense counsel other than the Public Defender, as the 15    case may be, upon order of the State's Attorney, Public 16    Defender or the court, respectively.17    (h) If a defendant in a capital case in Cook County is 18represented by court appointed counsel other than the Cook 19County Public Defender, the appointed counsel shall petition 20the court for an order directing the Cook County Treasurer to 21pay the court appointed counsel's reasonable and necessary 22compensation and capital litigation expenses from grant moneys 23provided from the Trust Fund. The petitions shall be supported 24by itemized bills showing the date, the amount of time spent, 25the work done, and the total being charged for each entry. The 26court shall not authorize payment of bills that are not   SB0299- 19 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1properly itemized. The petitions shall be filed under seal and 2considered ex parte but with a court reporter present for all 3ex parte conferences. The petitions shall be reviewed by both 4the trial judge and the presiding judge of the circuit court or 5the presiding judge's designee. The petitions and orders shall 6be kept under seal and shall be exempt from Freedom of 7Information requests until the conclusion of the trial and 8appeal of the case, even if the prosecution chooses not to 9pursue the death penalty prior to trial or sentencing. Orders 10denying petitions for compensation or expenses are final. 11Counsel may not petition for expenses that may have been 12provided or compensated by the State Appellate Defender under 13item (c)(5.1) of Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender 14Act.15    (i) In counties other than Cook County, and when the 16Attorney General is ordered by the presiding judge of the 17Criminal Division of the Circuit Court of Cook County to 18prosecute or supervise the prosecution of Cook County cases, 19and excluding capital litigation expenses or services that may 20have been provided by the State Appellate Defender under item 21(c)(5.1) of Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender Act:22        (1) Upon certification by the circuit court, on a form 23    created by the State Treasurer, that all or a portion of 24    the expenses are reasonable, necessary, and appropriate 25    for payment from the Trust Fund and the court's delivery 26    of the certification to the Treasurer, the Treasurer shall   SB0299- 20 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    pay the certified expenses of Public Defenders and the 2    State Appellate Defender from the money appropriated to 3    the Treasurer for capital litigation expenses of Public 4    Defenders and post-conviction proceeding expenses in 5    capital cases of the State Appellate Defender and expenses 6    in relation to petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the 7    Code of Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases in 8    any county other than Cook County, if there are sufficient 9    moneys in the Trust Fund to pay the expenses.10        (2) If a defendant in a capital case is represented by 11    court appointed counsel other than the Public Defender, 12    the appointed counsel shall petition the court to certify 13    compensation and capital litigation expenses including, 14    but not limited to, investigatory and other assistance, 15    expert, forensic, and other witnesses, and mitigation 16    specialists as reasonable, necessary, and appropriate for 17    payment from the Trust Fund. If a petitioner in a capital 18    case who has filed a petition for post-conviction relief 19    under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 20    1963 or a petition under Section 2-1401 of the Code of 21    Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases is 22    represented by an attorney approved by or contracted with 23    the State Appellate Defender other than the State 24    Appellate Defender, that attorney shall petition the court 25    to certify compensation and litigation expenses of 26    post-conviction proceedings under Article 122 of the Code   SB0299- 21 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    of Criminal Procedure of 1963 or in relation to petitions 2    filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure 3    in relation to capital cases. Upon certification on a form 4    created by the State Treasurer of all or a portion of the 5    compensation and expenses certified as reasonable, 6    necessary, and appropriate for payment from the Trust Fund 7    and the court's delivery of the certification to the 8    Treasurer, the State Treasurer shall pay the certified 9    compensation and expenses from the money appropriated to 10    the Treasurer for that purpose, if there are sufficient 11    moneys in the Trust Fund to make those payments.12        (3) A petition for capital litigation expenses or 13    post-conviction proceeding expenses or expenses incurred 14    in filing a petition under Section 2-1401 of the Code of 15    Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases under this 16    subsection shall be considered under seal and reviewed ex 17    parte with a court reporter present. Orders denying 18    petitions for compensation or expenses are final.19    (j) If the Trust Fund is discontinued or dissolved by an 20Act of the General Assembly or by operation of law, any balance 21remaining in the Trust Fund shall be returned to the General 22Revenue Fund after deduction of administrative costs, any 23other provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding.  24    Section 90. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 25changing Section 7.5 as follows:   SB0299- 22 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)2    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 3by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 4exempt from inspection and copying:5        (a) All information determined to be confidential 6    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 7    Development Act.8        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 9    library users with specific materials under the Library 10    Records Confidentiality Act.11        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 12    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 13    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 14    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 15    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 16    has received.17        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 18    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 19    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 20    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 21    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 22    Infection Control Act.23        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 24    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.25        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of   SB0299- 23 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 2    Qualifications Based Selection Act.3        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 4    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 5    Tuition Act.6        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 7    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 8    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 9    general's office that would be exempt if created or 10    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 11    that Act.12        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 13    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 14    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 15    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.16        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 17    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 18    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.19        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 20    or driver identification information compiled by a law 21    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 22    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.23        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 24    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 25    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 26    Prevention Review Team Act.  SB0299- 24 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 2    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 3    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 4    authorized under that Article.5        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 6    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 7    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 8    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed) or the Capital 9    Crimes Litigation Act of 2025. This subsection (n) shall 10    apply until the conclusion of the trial of the case, even 11    if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the death penalty 12    prior to trial or sentencing.13        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 14    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 15    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.16        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 17    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 18    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 19    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 20    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 21    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 22    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 23    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 24    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 25    Act (repealed). 26        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the   SB0299- 25 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Personnel Record Review Act. 2        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 3    Illinois School Student Records Act. 4        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 5    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 6        (t) (Blank). 7        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 8    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 9    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 10        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 11    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 12    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 13    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 14    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 15    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 16    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 17    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 18    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 19    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 20        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 21    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 22    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.23        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 24    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 25    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.26        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure   SB0299- 26 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 2    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 3        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 4    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 5    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 6    information about the identity and administrative finding 7    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 8    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 9    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 10    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 11        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 12    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 13    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 14    Act. 15        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 16    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 17        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 18    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 19        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 20    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 21    authorized under that Act.22        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 23    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 24    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 25        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 26    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act.   SB0299- 27 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 2    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 3        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 4    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 5    Code. 6        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 7    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 8        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 9    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 10    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 11        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 12    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 13    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 14    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 15    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 16        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 17    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 18        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 19    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 20    Aid Code. 21        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 22    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 23        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 25        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 26    arising out of a peer support counseling session   SB0299- 28 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 2    Suicide Prevention Act. 3        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 4    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 5    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 6    Prevention Act. 7        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 8    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 9    under the Reproductive Health Act. 10        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 12        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 13    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 14    Human Rights Act.15        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 16    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 17    Act. 18        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 20        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 21    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 22    Public Aid Code. 23        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 25        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 26    information that shall not be made public under the   SB0299- 29 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Illinois Insurance Code. 2        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 3    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.4        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 5    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 6        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 7    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 8        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 9    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 10    Police Act. 11        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 12    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 13    Administrative Code of Illinois. 14        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 15    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 16    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 17    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 18        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 19    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 20    Violence Fatality Review Act. 21        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 22    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 23    July 1, 2025. 24        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 25    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 26    Agency Licensing Act.   SB0299- 30 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 2    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 3    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 4    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 5    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 6    Act. 7        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 8    the School Safety Drill Act. 9        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 10    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 11        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 12    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 13    Act. 14        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 15    2-3.196 of the School Code. 16        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 17    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 18    Power Agency Act. 19        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 20    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 21    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 22        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 23    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 24    Act. 25        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 26    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity   SB0299- 31 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Act. 2        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 3    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 4        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 5    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 6    Transmission Modernization Act. 7        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 10102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 118-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 12102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 136-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 14eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 15103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 167-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 17eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 18103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 19    Section 95. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 20Section 5.1030 as follows: 21    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)22    Sec. 5.1030. The Capital Litigation Trust Fund. 23    (30 ILCS 105/5.790 rep.)  SB0299- 32 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Section 100. The State Finance Act is amended by repealing 2Section 5.790. 3    Section 110. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 4amended by changing Sections 113-3 and 119-1 as follows: 5    (725 ILCS 5/113-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 113-3)6    Sec. 113-3. (a) Every person charged with an offense shall 7be allowed counsel before pleading to the charge. If the 8defendant desires counsel and has been unable to obtain same 9before arraignment the court shall recess court or continue 10the cause for a reasonable time to permit defendant to obtain 11counsel and consult with him before pleading to the charge. If 12the accused is a dissolved corporation, and is not represented 13by counsel, the court may, in the interest of justice, appoint 14as counsel a licensed attorney of this State.15    (b) In all cases, except where the penalty is a fine only, 16if the court determines that the defendant is indigent and 17desires counsel, the Public Defender shall be appointed as 18counsel. If there is no Public Defender in the county or if the 19defendant requests counsel other than the Public Defender and 20the court finds that the rights of the defendant will be 21prejudiced by the appointment of the Public Defender, the 22court shall appoint as counsel a licensed attorney at law of 23this State, except that in a county having a population of 242,000,000 or more the Public Defender shall be appointed as   SB0299- 33 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1counsel in all misdemeanor cases where the defendant is 2indigent and desires counsel unless the case involves multiple 3defendants, in which case the court may appoint counsel other 4than the Public Defender for the additional defendants. The 5court shall require an affidavit signed by any defendant who 6requests court-appointed counsel. Such affidavit shall be in 7the form established by the Supreme Court containing 8sufficient information to ascertain the assets and liabilities 9of that defendant. The Court may direct the Clerk of the 10Circuit Court to assist the defendant in the completion of the 11affidavit. Any person who knowingly files such affidavit 12containing false information concerning his assets and 13liabilities shall be liable to the county where the case, in 14which such false affidavit is filed, is pending for the 15reasonable value of the services rendered by the public 16defender or other court-appointed counsel in the case to the 17extent that such services were unjustly or falsely procured.18    (c) Upon the filing with the court of a verified statement 19of services rendered the court shall order the county 20treasurer of the county of trial to pay counsel other than the 21Public Defender a reasonable fee. The court shall consider all 22relevant circumstances, including but not limited to the time 23spent while court is in session, other time spent in 24representing the defendant, and expenses reasonably incurred 25by counsel. In counties with a population greater than 262,000,000, the court shall order the county treasurer of the   SB0299- 34 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1county of trial to pay counsel other than the Public Defender a 2reasonable fee stated in the order and based upon a rate of 3compensation of not more than $40 for each hour spent while 4court is in session and not more than $30 for each hour 5otherwise spent representing a defendant, and such 6compensation shall not exceed $150 for each defendant 7represented in misdemeanor cases and $1250 in felony cases, in 8addition to expenses reasonably incurred as hereinafter in 9this Section provided, except that, in extraordinary 10circumstances, payment in excess of the limits herein stated 11may be made if the trial court certifies that such payment is 12necessary to provide fair compensation for protracted 13representation. A trial court may entertain the filing of this 14verified statement before the termination of the cause, and 15may order the provisional payment of sums during the pendency 16of the cause.17    (d) In capital cases, in addition to counsel, if the court 18determines that the defendant is indigent the court may, upon 19the filing with the court of a verified statement of services 20rendered, order the county Treasurer of the county of trial to 21pay necessary expert witnesses for defendant reasonable 22compensation stated in the order not to exceed $250 for each 23defendant.24    (e) If the court in any county having a population greater 25than 2,000,000 determines that the defendant is indigent the 26court may, upon the filing with the court of a verified   SB0299- 35 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1statement of such expenses, order the county treasurer of the 2county of trial, in such counties having a population greater 3than 2,000,000 to pay the general expenses of the trial 4incurred by the defendant not to exceed $50 for each 5defendant.6    (f) The provisions of this Section relating to appointment 7of counsel, compensation of counsel, and payment of expenses 8in capital cases apply except when the compensation and 9expenses are being provided under the Capital Crimes 10Litigation Act of 2025.11(Source: P.A. 91-589, eff. 1-1-00.) 12    (725 ILCS 5/119-1)13    Sec. 119-1. Death penalty restored abolished.14    (a) (Blank). Beginning on the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, notwithstanding 16any other law to the contrary, the death penalty is abolished 17and a sentence to death may not be imposed. 18    (b) All unobligated and unexpended moneys remaining in the 19Capital Litigation Trust Fund on the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall be 21transferred into the Death Penalty Abolition Fund on the 22effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 23Assembly shall be transferred into the Capital Litigation 24Trust Fund , a special fund in the State treasury, to be 25expended by the Illinois Criminal Justice Information   SB0299- 36 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1Authority, for services for families of victims of homicide or 2murder and for training of law enforcement personnel. 3(Source: P.A. 96-1543, eff. 7-1-11.) 4    Section 115. The State Appellate Defender Act is amended 5by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 105/10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 208-10)7    Sec. 10. Powers and duties of State Appellate Defender. 8    (a) The State Appellate Defender shall represent indigent 9persons on appeal in criminal and delinquent minor 10proceedings, when appointed to do so by a court under a Supreme 11Court Rule or law of this State. 12    (b) The State Appellate Defender shall submit a budget for 13the approval of the State Appellate Defender Commission.14    (c) The State Appellate Defender may:15        (1) maintain a panel of private attorneys available to 16    serve as counsel on a case basis;17        (2) establish programs, alone or in conjunction with 18    law schools, for the purpose of utilizing volunteer law 19    students as legal assistants;20        (3) cooperate and consult with state agencies, 21    professional associations, and other groups concerning the 22    causes of criminal conduct, the rehabilitation and 23    correction of persons charged with and convicted of crime, 24    the administration of criminal justice, and, in counties   SB0299- 37 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    of less than 1,000,000 population, study, design, develop 2    and implement model systems for the delivery of trial 3    level defender services, and make an annual report to the 4    General Assembly;5        (4) hire investigators to provide investigative 6    services to appointed counsel and county public defenders;7        (5) (blank);8        (5.1) in cases in which a death sentence is an 9    authorized disposition, provide trial counsel with legal 10    assistance and the assistance of expert witnesses, 11    investigators, and mitigation specialists from funds 12    appropriated to the State Appellate Defender specifically 13    for that purpose by the General Assembly. The Office of 14    State Appellate Defender shall not be appointed to serve 15    as trial counsel in capital cases; 16        (5.5) provide training to county public defenders;17        (5.7) provide county public defenders with the 18    assistance of expert witnesses and investigators from 19    funds appropriated to the State Appellate Defender 20    specifically for that purpose by the General Assembly. The 21    Office of the State Appellate Defender shall not be 22    appointed to act as trial counsel;23        (6) develop a Juvenile Defender Resource Center to: 24    (i) study, design, develop, and implement model systems 25    for the delivery of trial level defender services for 26    juveniles in the justice system; (ii) in cases in which a   SB0299- 38 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    sentence of incarceration or an adult sentence, or both, 2    is an authorized disposition, provide trial counsel with 3    legal advice and the assistance of expert witnesses and 4    investigators from funds appropriated to the Office of the 5    State Appellate Defender by the General Assembly 6    specifically for that purpose; (iii) develop and provide 7    training to public defenders on juvenile justice issues, 8    utilizing resources including the State and local bar 9    associations, the Illinois Public Defender Association, 10    law schools, the Midwest Juvenile Defender Center, and pro 11    bono efforts by law firms; and (iv) make an annual report 12    to the General Assembly.13    Investigators employed by the Capital Trial Assistance 14Unit and Capital Post Conviction Unit of the State Appellate 15Defender shall be authorized to inquire through the Illinois 16State Police or local law enforcement with the Law Enforcement 17Agencies Data System (LEADS) under Section 2605-375 of the 18Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to ascertain whether 19their potential witnesses have a criminal background, 20including, but not limited to: (i) warrants; (ii) arrests; 21(iii) convictions; and (iv) officer safety information. This 22authorization applies only to information held on the State 23level and shall be used only to protect the personal safety of 24the investigators. Any information that is obtained through 25this inquiry may not be disclosed by the investigators. 26    (c-5) For each State fiscal year, the State Appellate   SB0299- 39 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1Defender shall request a direct appropriation from the Capital 2Litigation Trust Fund for expenses incurred by the State 3Appellate Defender in providing assistance to trial attorneys 4under paragraph (5.1) of subsection (c) of this Section and 5for expenses incurred by the State Appellate Defender in 6representing petitioners in capital cases in post-conviction 7proceedings under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal 8Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed under 9Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation to 10capital cases and for the representation of those petitioners 11by attorneys approved by or contracted with the State 12Appellate Defender and an appropriation to the State Treasurer 13for payments from the Trust Fund for the defense of cases in 14counties other than Cook County. The State Appellate Defender 15may appear before the General Assembly at other times during 16the State's fiscal year to request supplemental appropriations 17from the Trust Fund to the State Treasurer. 18    (d) (Blank).19    (e) The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 20shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 21by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act and 22filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 23Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 24under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.25(Source: P.A. 99-78, eff. 7-20-15; 100-1148, eff. 12-10-18.)   SB0299- 40 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Section 925. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 2changing Section 5-8-1 as follows: 3    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1)4    Sec. 5-8-1. Natural life imprisonment; enhancements for 5use of a firearm; mandatory supervised release terms. 6    (a) Except as otherwise provided in the statute defining 7the offense or in Article 4.5 of Chapter V, a sentence of 8imprisonment for a felony shall be a determinate sentence set 9by the court under this Section, subject to Section 5-4.5-115 10of this Code, according to the following limitations:11        (1) for first degree murder,12            (a) (Blank). (blank),13            (a-1) If the defendant had at the time of the 14        commission of the offense attained 18 years of age or 15        more, the court may sentence the defendant to death 16        under the procedures described in subsections (a-2) 17        through (a-11) if:18                (1) the murdered individual was a peace 19            officer killed in the course of performing his or 20            her official duties, to prevent the performance of 21            his or her official duties, or in retaliation for 22            performing his or her official duties, and the 23            defendant knew or should have known that the 24            murdered individual was so employed; 25                (2) the murdered individual was an employee of   SB0299- 41 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            an institution or facility of the Department of 2            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 3            agency, killed in the course of performing his or 4            her official duties, to prevent the performance of 5            his or her official duties, or in retaliation for 6            performing his or her official duties; or7                (3) the murdered individual was an emergency 8            medical technician - ambulance, emergency medical 9            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 10            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 11            medical assistance or first aid personnel, 12            employed by a municipality or other governmental 13            unit, killed in the course of performing his or 14            her official duties, to prevent the performance of 15            his or her official duties, or in retaliation for 16            performing his or her official duties, and the 17            defendant knew or should have known that the 18            murdered individual was an emergency medical 19            technician - ambulance, emergency medical 20            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 21            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 22            medical assistance or first aid personnel. 23            (a-2) The court shall consider, or shall instruct 24        the jury to consider, any aggravating and any 25        mitigating factors which are relevant to the 26        imposition of the death penalty. Aggravating factors   SB0299- 42 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        may include, but need not be limited to, those factors 2        set forth in subsections (b) and (b-5). Mitigating 3        factors may include, but need not be limited to, the 4        following:5                (1) the defendant has no significant history 6            of prior criminal activity;7                (2) the murder was committed while the 8            defendant was under the influence of extreme 9            mental or emotional disturbance, although not such 10            as to constitute a defense to prosecution;11                (3) the murdered individual was a participant 12            in the defendant's homicidal conduct or consented 13            to the homicidal act;14                (4) the defendant acted under the compulsion 15            of threat or menace of the imminent infliction of 16            death or great bodily harm;17                (5) the defendant was not personally present 18            during commission of the act or acts causing 19            death;20                (6) the defendant's background includes a 21            history of extreme emotional or physical abuse;22                (7) the defendant suffers from a reduced 23            mental capacity. Provided, however, that an action 24            that does not otherwise mitigate first degree 25            murder cannot qualify as a mitigating factor for 26            first degree murder because of the discovery,   SB0299- 43 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            knowledge, or disclosure of the victim's sexual 2            orientation as defined in Section 1-103 of the 3            Illinois Human Rights Act.4            (a-3) If requested by the State, the court shall 5        conduct a separate sentencing proceeding to determine 6        the existence of factors set forth in subsections (b) 7        and (b-5) and to consider any aggravating or 8        mitigating factors as indicated in this subsection 9        (a-2). The proceeding shall be conducted:10                (1) before the jury that determined the 11            defendant's guilt; or12                (2) before a jury impanelled for the purpose 13            of the proceeding if: 14                    (A) the defendant was convicted upon a 15                plea of guilty; or 16                    (B) the defendant was convicted after a 17                trial before the court sitting without a jury; 18                or19                    (C) the court for good cause shown 20                discharges the jury that determined the 21                defendant's guilt; or22                (3) before the court alone if the defendant 23            waives a jury for the separate proceeding. 24            (a-4) During the proceeding any information 25        relevant to any of the factors set forth in 26        subsections (b) and (b-5) may be presented by either   SB0299- 44 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        the State or the defendant under the rules governing 2        the admission of evidence at criminal trials. Any 3        information relevant to any additional aggravating 4        factors or any mitigating factors indicated in 5        subsection (a-2) may be presented by the State or 6        defendant regardless of its admissibility under the 7        rules governing the admission of evidence at criminal 8        trials. The State and the defendant shall be given 9        fair opportunity to rebut any information received at 10        the hearing.11            (a-5) The burden of proof of establishing the 12        existence of any of the factors set forth in 13        subsections (b) and (b-5) is on the State and shall not 14        be satisfied unless established beyond a reasonable 15        doubt.16            (a-6) If at the separate sentencing proceeding the 17        jury finds that none of the factors set forth in 18        subsections (b) and (b-5) exists, the court shall 19        sentence the defendant to a term of imprisonment under 20        Chapter V. If there is a unanimous finding by the jury 21        that one or more of the factors set forth in 22        subsections (b) and (b-5) exist, the jury shall 23        consider aggravating and mitigating factors as 24        instructed by the court and shall determine whether 25        the sentence of death shall be imposed. If the jury 26        determines unanimously, after weighing the factors in   SB0299- 45 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        aggravation and mitigation, that death is the 2        appropriate sentence, the court shall sentence the 3        defendant to death. If the court does not concur with 4        the jury determination that death is the appropriate 5        sentence, the court shall set forth reasons in writing 6        including what facts or circumstances the court relied 7        upon, along with any relevant documents, that 8        compelled the court to non-concur with the sentence. 9        This document and any attachments shall be part of the 10        record for appellate review. The court shall be bound 11        by the jury's sentencing determination. If after 12        weighing the factors in aggravation and mitigation, 13        one or more jurors determines that death is not the 14        appropriate sentence, the court shall sentence the 15        defendant to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V of 16        the Unified Code of Corrections.17            (a-7) In a proceeding before the court alone, if 18        the court finds that none of the factors found in 19        subsections (b) and (b-5) exists, the court shall 20        sentence the defendant to a term of imprisonment under 21        Chapter V of the Unified Code of Corrections. If the 22        Court determines that one or more of the factors set 23        forth in subsections (b) and (b-5) exists, the court 24        shall consider any aggravating and mitigating factors 25        as indicated in subsection (a-2). If the court 26        determines, after weighing the factors in aggravation   SB0299- 46 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        and mitigation, that death is the appropriate 2        sentence, the Court shall sentence the defendant to 3        death. If the court finds that death is not the 4        appropriate sentence, the court shall sentence the 5        defendant to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V of 6        the Unified Code of Corrections.7            (a-8) In a case in which the defendant has been 8        found guilty of first degree murder by a judge or jury, 9        or a case on remand for resentencing, and the State 10        seeks the death penalty as an appropriate sentence, on 11        the court's own motion or the written motion of the 12        defendant, the court may decertify the case as a death 13        penalty case if the court finds that the only evidence 14        supporting the defendant's conviction is the 15        uncorroborated testimony of an informant witness, as 16        defined in Section 115-21 of the Code of Criminal 17        Procedure of 1963, concerning the confession or 18        admission of the defendant or that the sole evidence 19        against the defendant is a single eyewitness or single 20        accomplice without any other corroborating evidence. 21        If the court decertifies the case as a capital case 22        under either of the grounds set forth above, the court 23        shall issue a written finding. The State may pursue 24        its right to appeal the decertification pursuant to 25        Supreme Court Rule 604(a)(1). If the court does not 26        decertify the case as a capital case, the matter shall   SB0299- 47 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        proceed to the eligibility phase of the sentencing 2        hearing.3            (a-9) The conviction and sentence of death shall 4        be subject to automatic review by the Supreme Court. 5        Such review shall be in accordance with rules 6        promulgated by the Supreme Court. The Illinois Supreme 7        Court may overturn the death sentence, and order the 8        imposition of imprisonment under Chapter V if the 9        court finds that the death sentence is fundamentally 10        unjust as applied to the particular case. If the 11        Illinois Supreme Court finds that the death sentence 12        is fundamentally unjust as applied to the particular 13        case, independent of any procedural grounds for 14        relief, the Illinois Supreme Court shall issue a 15        written opinion explaining this finding.16            (a-10) If the death penalty in this amendatory Act 17        of the 104th General Assembly is held to be 18        unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the United 19        States or of the State of Illinois, any person 20        convicted of first degree murder shall be sentenced by 21        the court to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V. If 22        any death sentence pursuant to the sentencing 23        provisions of this Section is declared 24        unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the United 25        States or of the State of Illinois, the court having 26        jurisdiction over a person previously sentenced to   SB0299- 48 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        death shall cause the defendant to be brought before 2        the court, and the court shall sentence the defendant 3        to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V.4            (a-11) The Attorney General and State's Attorneys 5        Association shall consult on voluntary guidelines for 6        procedures governing whether or not to seek the death 7        penalty. The guidelines do not have the force of law 8        and are only advisory in nature. 9            (b) If if a trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable 10        doubt that the murder was accompanied by exceptionally 11        brutal or heinous behavior indicative of wanton 12        cruelty or, except as set forth in subsection 13        (a)(1)(c) of this Section, that any of the aggravating 14        factors listed in subparagraph (b-5) are present, the 15        court may sentence the defendant, subject to Section 16        5-4.5-105, to a term of natural life imprisonment. , 17        or18            (b-5) A defendant who at the time of the 19        commission of the offense has attained the age of 18 or 20        more and who has been found guilty of first degree 21        murder for which the death penalty has not been 22        imposed by the court may be sentenced to a term of 23        natural life imprisonment if: 24                (1) the murdered individual was an inmate at 25            an institution or facility of the Department of 26            Corrections, or any similar local correctional   SB0299- 49 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            agency and was killed on the grounds thereof, or 2            the murdered individual was otherwise present in 3            such institution or facility with the knowledge 4            and approval of the chief administrative officer 5            thereof; 6                (2) the murdered individual was killed as a 7            result of the hijacking of an airplane, train, 8            ship, bus, or other public conveyance; 9                (3) the defendant committed the murder 10            pursuant to a contract, agreement, or 11            understanding by which he or she was to receive 12            money or anything of value in return for 13            committing the murder or procured another to 14            commit the murder for money or anything of value; 15                (4) the murdered individual was killed in the 16            course of another felony if: 17                    (A) the murdered individual: 18                        (i) was actually killed by the 19                    defendant, or 20                        (ii) received physical injuries 21                    personally inflicted by the defendant 22                    substantially contemporaneously with 23                    physical injuries caused by one or more 24                    persons for whose conduct the defendant is 25                    legally accountable under Section 5-2 of 26                    this Code, and the physical injuries   SB0299- 50 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1                    inflicted by either the defendant or the 2                    other person or persons for whose conduct 3                    he is legally accountable caused the death 4                    of the murdered individual; and (B) in 5                    performing the acts which caused the death 6                    of the murdered individual or which 7                    resulted in physical injuries personally 8                    inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 9                    individual under the circumstances of 10                    subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this 11                    clause (4), the defendant acted with the 12                    intent to kill the murdered individual or 13                    with the knowledge that his or her acts 14                    created a strong probability of death or 15                    great bodily harm to the murdered 16                    individual or another; and 17                    (B) in performing the acts which caused 18                the death of the murdered individual or which 19                resulted in physical injuries personally 20                inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 21                individual under the circumstances of 22                subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this clause 23                (4), the defendant acted with the intent to 24                kill the murdered individual or with the 25                knowledge that his or her acts created a 26                strong probability of death or great bodily   SB0299- 51 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1                harm to the murdered individual or another; 2                and 3                    (C) the other felony was an inherently 4                violent crime or the attempt to commit an 5                inherently violent crime. In this clause (C), 6                "inherently violent crime" includes, but is 7                not limited to, armed robbery, robbery, 8                predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 9                aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated 10                kidnapping, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 11                aggravated arson, aggravated stalking, 12                residential burglary, and home invasion; 13                (5) the defendant committed the murder with 14            intent to prevent the murdered individual from 15            testifying or participating in any criminal 16            investigation or prosecution or giving material 17            assistance to the State in any investigation or 18            prosecution, either against the defendant or 19            another; or the defendant committed the murder 20            because the murdered individual was a witness in 21            any prosecution or gave material assistance to the 22            State in any investigation or prosecution, either 23            against the defendant or another; for purposes of 24            this clause (5), "participating in any criminal 25            investigation or prosecution" is intended to 26            include those appearing in the proceedings in any   SB0299- 52 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            capacity such as trial judges, prosecutors, 2            defense attorneys, investigators, witnesses, or 3            jurors; 4                (6) the defendant, while committing an offense 5            punishable under Section 401, 401.1, 401.2, 405, 6            405.2, 407, or 407.1 or subsection (b) of Section 7            404 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 8            while engaged in a conspiracy or solicitation to 9            commit such offense, intentionally killed an 10            individual or counseled, commanded, induced, 11            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 12            murdered individual; 13                (7) the defendant was incarcerated in an 14            institution or facility of the Department of 15            Corrections at the time of the murder, and while 16            committing an offense punishable as a felony under 17            Illinois law, or while engaged in a conspiracy or 18            solicitation to commit such offense, intentionally 19            killed an individual or counseled, commanded, 20            induced, procured, or caused the intentional 21            killing of the murdered individual; 22                (8) the murder was committed in a cold, 23            calculated and premeditated manner pursuant to a 24            preconceived plan, scheme, or design to take a 25            human life by unlawful means, and the conduct of 26            the defendant created a reasonable expectation   SB0299- 53 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            that the death of a human being would result 2            therefrom; 3                (9) the defendant was a principal 4            administrator, organizer, or leader of a 5            calculated criminal drug conspiracy consisting of 6            a hierarchical position of authority superior to 7            that of all other members of the conspiracy, and 8            the defendant counseled, commanded, induced, 9            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 10            murdered person; 11                (10) the murder was intentional and involved 12            the infliction of torture. For the purpose of this 13            clause (10), torture means the infliction of or 14            subjection to extreme physical pain, motivated by 15            an intent to increase or prolong the pain, 16            suffering, or agony of the victim; 17                (11) the murder was committed as a result of 18            the intentional discharge of a firearm by the 19            defendant from a motor vehicle and the victim was 20            not present within the motor vehicle; 21                (12) the murdered individual was a person with 22            a disability and the defendant knew or should have 23            known that the murdered individual was a person 24            with a disability. For purposes of this clause 25            (12), "person with a disability" means a person 26            who suffers from a permanent physical or mental   SB0299- 54 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            impairment resulting from disease, an injury, a 2            functional disorder, or a congenital condition 3            that renders the person incapable of adequately 4            providing for his or her own health or personal 5            care; 6                (13) the murdered individual was subject to an 7            order of protection and the murder was committed 8            by a person against whom the same order of 9            protection was issued under the Illinois Domestic 10            Violence Act of 1986; 11                (14) the murdered individual was known by the 12            defendant to be a teacher or other person employed 13            in any school and the teacher or other employee is 14            upon the grounds of a school or grounds adjacent 15            to a school, or is in any part of a building used 16            for school purposes; 17                (15) the murder was committed by the defendant 18            in connection with or as a result of the offense of 19            terrorism as defined in Section 29D-14.9 of this 20            Code; 21                (16) the murdered individual was a member of a 22            congregation engaged in prayer or other religious 23            activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or 24            other building, structure, or place used for 25            religious worship; or 26                (17)(i) the murdered individual was a   SB0299- 55 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 2            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse; 3                (ii) the defendant knew or should have known 4            that the murdered individual was a physician, 5            physician assistant, psychologist, nurse, or 6            advanced practice registered nurse; and 7                (iii) the murdered individual was killed in 8            the course of acting in his or her capacity as a 9            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 10            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, or 11            to prevent him or her from acting in that 12            capacity, or in retaliation for his or her acting 13            in that capacity. 14            (c) If the court does not impose the death 15        penalty, the court shall sentence the defendant to a 16        term of natural life imprisonment if the defendant, at 17        the time of the commission of the murder, had attained 18        the age of 18, and: 19                (i) has previously been convicted of first 20            degree murder under any state or federal law, or21                (ii) is found guilty of murdering more than 22            one victim, or23                (iii) is found guilty of murdering a peace 24            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 25            when the peace officer, fireman, or emergency 26            management worker was killed in the course of   SB0299- 56 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            performing his official duties, or to prevent the 2            peace officer or fireman from performing his 3            official duties, or in retaliation for the peace 4            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 5            from performing his official duties, and the 6            defendant knew or should have known that the 7            murdered individual was a peace officer, fireman, 8            or emergency management worker, or9                (iv) is found guilty of murdering an employee 10            of an institution or facility of the Department of 11            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 12            agency, when the employee was killed in the course 13            of performing his official duties, or to prevent 14            the employee from performing his official duties, 15            or in retaliation for the employee performing his 16            official duties, or17                (v) is found guilty of murdering an emergency 18            medical technician - ambulance, emergency medical 19            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 20            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 21            medical assistance or first aid person while 22            employed by a municipality or other governmental 23            unit when the person was killed in the course of 24            performing official duties or to prevent the 25            person from performing official duties or in 26            retaliation for performing official duties and the   SB0299- 57 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1            defendant knew or should have known that the 2            murdered individual was an emergency medical 3            technician - ambulance, emergency medical 4            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 5            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 6            medical assistant or first aid personnel, or7                (vi) (blank), or8                (vii) is found guilty of first degree murder 9            and the murder was committed by reason of any 10            person's activity as a community policing 11            volunteer or to prevent any person from engaging 12            in activity as a community policing volunteer. For 13            the purpose of this Section, "community policing 14            volunteer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 15            Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.16            For purposes of clause (v), "emergency medical 17        technician - ambulance", "emergency medical technician -18         intermediate", and "emergency medical technician - 19        paramedic", have the meanings ascribed to them in the 20        Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.21            (d)(i) if the person committed the offense while 22            armed with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to 23            the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;24            (ii) if, during the commission of the offense, the 25        person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall 26        be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the   SB0299- 58 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1        court;2            (iii) if, during the commission of the offense, 3        the person personally discharged a firearm that 4        proximately caused great bodily harm, permanent 5        disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 6        another person, 25 years or up to a term of natural 7        life shall be added to the term of imprisonment 8        imposed by the court.9        (2) (blank);10        (2.5) for a person who has attained the age of 18 years 11    at the time of the commission of the offense and who is 12    convicted under the circumstances described in subdivision 13    (b)(1)(B) of Section 11-1.20 or paragraph (3) of 14    subsection (b) of Section 12-13, subdivision (d)(2) of 15    Section 11-1.30 or paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 16    Section 12-14, subdivision (b)(1.2) of Section 11-1.40 or 17    paragraph (1.2) of subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1, 18    subdivision (b)(2) of Section 11-1.40 or paragraph (2) of 19    subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 20    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the sentence shall be a 21    term of natural life imprisonment.22    (b) (Blank).23    (c) (Blank).24    (d) Subject to earlier termination under Section 3-3-8, 25the parole or mandatory supervised release term shall be 26written as part of the sentencing order and shall be as   SB0299- 59 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1follows:2        (1) for first degree murder or for the offenses of 3    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 4    criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual assault if 5    committed on or before December 12, 2005, 3 years;6        (1.5) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 7    subsection (d), for a Class X felony except for the 8    offenses of predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 9    aggravated criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual 10    assault if committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the 11    effective date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the 12    offense of aggravated child pornography under Section 13    11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 with sentencing under 14    subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code 15    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if committed on or 16    after January 1, 2009, and except for the offense of 17    obscene depiction of a purported child with sentencing 18    under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal 19    Code of 2012, 18 months; 20        (2) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 21    subsection (d), for a Class 1 felony or a Class 2 felony 22    except for the offense of criminal sexual assault if 23    committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the effective 24    date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the offenses of 25    manufacture and dissemination of child pornography under 26    clauses (a)(1) and (a)(2) of Section 11-20.1 of the   SB0299- 60 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if 2    committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for the 3    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 4    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 5    Criminal Code of 2012, 12 months;6        (3) except as provided in paragraph (4), (6), or (7) 7    of this subsection (d), for a Class 3 felony or a Class 4 8    felony, 6 months; no later than 45 days after the onset of 9    the term of mandatory supervised release, the Prisoner 10    Review Board shall conduct a discretionary discharge 11    review pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-3-8, which 12    shall include the results of a standardized risk and needs 13    assessment tool administered by the Department of 14    Corrections; the changes to this paragraph (3) made by 15    Public Act 102-1104 this amendatory Act of the 102nd 16    General Assembly apply to all individuals released on 17    mandatory supervised release on or after December 6, 2022 18    (the effective date of Public Act 102-1104) this 19    amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, including 20    those individuals whose sentences were imposed prior to 21    December 6, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 22    102-1104) this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 23    Assembly;24        (4) for defendants who commit the offense of predatory 25    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 26    sexual assault, or criminal sexual assault, on or after   SB0299- 61 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 2    94-715), or who commit the offense of aggravated child 3    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 4    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 5    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 6    manufacture of child pornography, or dissemination of 7    child pornography after January 1, 2009, or who commit the 8    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 9    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 10    Criminal Code of 2012 or who commit the offense of obscene 11    depiction of a purported child with sentencing under 12    subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 13    2012, the term of mandatory supervised release shall range 14    from a minimum of 3 years to a maximum of the natural life 15    of the defendant;16        (5) if the victim is under 18 years of age, for a 17    second or subsequent offense of aggravated criminal sexual 18    abuse or felony criminal sexual abuse, 4 years, at least 19    the first 2 years of which the defendant shall serve in an 20    electronic monitoring or home detention program under 21    Article 8A of Chapter V of this Code;22        (6) for a felony domestic battery, aggravated domestic 23    battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, and a felony 24    violation of an order of protection, 4 years; 25        (7) for any felony described in paragraph (a)(2)(ii), 26    (a)(2)(iii), (a)(2)(iv), (a)(2)(vi), (a)(2.1), (a)(2.3),   SB0299- 62 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1    (a)(2.4), (a)(2.5), or (a)(2.6) of Article 5, Section 2    3-6-3 of the Unified Code of Corrections requiring an 3    inmate to serve a minimum of 85% of their court-imposed 4    sentence, except for the offenses of predatory criminal 5    sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 6    assault, and criminal sexual assault if committed on or 7    after December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 8    94-715) and except for the offense of aggravated child 9    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 10    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 11    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 12    if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for 13    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 14    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 15    Criminal Code of 2012, and except as provided in paragraph 16    (4) or paragraph (6) of this subsection (d), the term of 17    mandatory supervised release shall be as follows:18            (A) Class X felony, 3 years;19            (B) Class 1 or Class 2 felonies, 2 years;20            (C) Class 3 or Class 4 felonies, 1 year. 21    (e) (Blank).22    (f) (Blank).23    (g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act and 24of Public Act 101-652: (i) the provisions of paragraph (3) of 25subsection (d) are effective on July 1, 2022 and shall apply to 26all individuals convicted on or after the effective date of   SB0299- 63 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1paragraph (3) of subsection (d); and (ii) the provisions of 2paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of subsection (d) are effective on 3July 1, 2021 and shall apply to all individuals convicted on or 4after the effective date of paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of 5subsection (d).6(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 7102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1104, eff. 12-6-22; 103-51, eff. 81-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-24-24.)  SB0299- 64 -LRB104 03898 RLC 13922 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    5 ILCS 140/7.55    30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new6    30 ILCS 105/5.790 rep.7    725 ILCS 5/113-3from Ch. 38, par. 113-38    725 ILCS 5/119-19    725 ILCS 105/10from Ch. 38, par. 208-1010    730 ILCS 5/5-8-1from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1